Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.247

When court retains jurisdiction after entry of decree of distribution.

After the entry of the decree of distribution in the probate proceedings the court shall retain jurisdiction for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of RCW 11.76.200, 11.76.210, 11.76.220, 11.76.230, 11.76.240, 11.76.243 and 11.76.245.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.76.247. Prior: 1955 ex.s. c 7 s 3.]